California statutes. Education Code
(d) The employer shall maintain the necessary records to separately identify each member who participates in the reduced workload program pursuant to this section.

(e) The agreement to reduce a member’s workload shall be terminated if one of the following actions is taken:

(1) The member’s employment is terminated prior to the end of the school term.

(2) The member earns less than one-half of the annualized pay rate as defined in Section
 22104.8.

(3) The member and the employer mutually agree that the member will perform creditable service without making contributions in accordance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c).

(f) Upon termination of the agreement for any of the reasons described in subdivision (e):

(1) The employer shall notify the system that the agreement to reduce a member’s workload has been terminated within 30 days of the agreement being terminated.

(2) The member’s service credit and contributions for that school year in which the agreement is terminated shall be computed in accordance with Section 22701 and Chapters 15 and 16.

(3) That school year in which the agreement is terminated shall not be included in the total amount of time in which a member is allowed to reduce their workload pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(4) Any subsequent agreement to reduce a member’s workload shall meet all of the conditions set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 239, Sec. 4.   (SB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22714.

(a) Whenever the governing board of a school district or a community college district or a county office of education, by formal action, determines pursuant to Section 44929 or 87488 that, because of impending curtailment of, or changes in, the manner of performing services, the best interests of the district or county office of education would be served by encouraging certificated employees or academic employees to retire for service and that the retirement will result in a net savings to the district or county office of education, an additional two years of service credit shall be granted under this part to a member of the Defined Benefit Program if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The
 member is credited with five or more years of service credit and retires for service under Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201) during a period of not more than 120 days or less than 60 days, commencing no sooner than the effective date of the formal action of the employer that shall specify the period.

(2) The documentation required by this section is received by the system no later than 30 calendar days after the last day of the window period established in paragraph (1).

(3) (A) The employer transfers to the retirement fund an amount determined by the Teachers’ Retirement Board to equal the actuarial equivalent of the difference between the allowance the member receives after receipt of service credit pursuant to this section and the amount the member
 would have received without the service credit and an amount determined by the Teachers’ Retirement Board to equal the actuarial equivalent of the difference between the purchasing power protection supplemental payment the member receives after receipt of service credit pursuant to this section and the amount the member would have received without the service credit. The payment for purchasing power shall be deposited in the Supplemental Benefit Maintenance Account established by Section 22400 and shall be subject to Section 24415. The transfer to the retirement fund shall be made in a manner and a time period, not to exceed eight years, that is acceptable to the Teachers’ Retirement Board. The employer shall transfer the required amount for all eligible employees who retire pursuant to this section.

(B) Regular interest shall be
 charged on the unpaid balance if the employer makes the transfer to the retirement fund in installments.

(4) The employer transmits to the retirement fund the administrative costs incurred by the system in implementing this section, as determined by the Teachers’ Retirement Board.

(5) The employer has considered the availability of teachers or academic employees to fill the positions that would be vacated pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) The school district shall demonstrate and certify to the county superintendent that the formal action taken would result in a net savings to the district.

(2) The county superintendent shall certify to
 the Teachers’ Retirement Board that the result specified in paragraph (1) can be demonstrated. The certification shall include, but not be limited to, the information specified in subdivision (c) of Section 14502.1.

(3) The school district shall reimburse the county superintendent for all costs to the county superintendent that result from the certification.

(c) (1) The county office of education shall demonstrate and certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that the formal action taken would result in a net savings to the county office of education.

(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall certify to the Teachers’ Retirement Board that the result specified in paragraph (1)
 can be demonstrated. The certification shall include, but not be limited to, the information specified in subdivision (c) of Section 14502.1.

(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may request reimbursement from the county office of education for all administrative costs that result from the certification.

(d) (1) The community college district shall demonstrate and certify to the chancellor’s office that the formal action taken would result in a net savings to the district.

(2) The chancellor shall certify to the Teachers’ Retirement Board that the result specified in paragraph (1) can be demonstrated. The certification shall include, but not be limited to, the information specified in
 subdivision (c) of Section 84040.5.

(3) The chancellor may request reimbursement from the community college district for all administrative costs that result from the certification.

(e) The opportunity to be granted service credit pursuant to this section shall be available to all members employed by the school district, community college district, or county office of education who meet the conditions set forth in this section.

(f) The amount of service credit shall be two years.

(g) Any member of the Defined Benefit Program who retires under this part for service under Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201) with service credit granted under this section and who
 subsequently reinstates shall forfeit the service credit granted under this section.

(h) Any member of the Defined Benefit Program who retires under this part for service under Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201) with service credit granted under this section and who takes any job as an employee, independent contractor, or as an employee of a third party with the school district, community college district, or county office of education that granted the member the service credit less than five years after receiving the credit shall forfeit the ongoing benefit the member receives from the additional service credit granted under this section.

(i) This section does not apply to any member otherwise eligible if the member receives any unemployment insurance payments arising
 out of employment with an employer subject to this part within one year following the effective date of the formal action under subdivision (a), or if the member is not otherwise eligible to retire for service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 10.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22715.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, whenever the Governor, by executive order, determines that because of an impending curtailment of, or change in the manner of performing service, the best interest of the state would be served by encouraging the retirement of state employees, and that sufficient economies could be realized to offset any cost to state agencies resulting from this section, an additional two years of service shall be credited under this part to members of the Defined Benefit Program, who are state employees, if the following conditions exist:

(1) The member is credited with five or more years of service and retires during a period not to exceed 120 days or less than 60 days commencing no
 sooner than the date of issuance of the Governor’s executive order specifying that period.

(2) (A) The appointing power, as defined in Section 18524 of the Government Code, transfers to the retirement fund an amount determined by the board to equal the actuarial equivalent of the difference between the allowance the member receives after the receipt of service credit under this section and the amount the member would have received without the service credit. The transfer to the retirement fund shall be made in a manner and time period acceptable to the employer and the board.

(B) Regular interest shall be charged on the unpaid balance if the employer makes the transfer to the retirement fund in installments.

(3) The appointing power determines that it is electing to exercise the provisions of
 this section, pursuant to the Governor’s order, and certifies to the Department of Finance and to the Legislative Analyst, as to the specific economies that would be realized if the additional service credit toward retirement were granted.

(b) As used in this section, “member” means a state employee who is employed in a job classification, department, or other organizational unit designated by the appointing power, as defined in Section 18524 of the Government Code.

(c) The amount of service credit shall be two years regardless of credited service, but shall not exceed the number of years intervening between the date of the member’s retirement under this part and the date the member would be required to be retired because of age. The appointing power shall make the payment with respect to all eligible employees who retire pursuant to this section.

(d) Any member who qualifies under this section, upon subsequent reinstatement under this part, shall forfeit the service credit granted under this section.

(e) This section shall not be applicable to any member otherwise eligible if that member receives any unemployment insurance payments arising out of employment with an employer subject to this part during a period extending one year beyond the date of issuance of the executive order or if the member is not eligible to retire without the additional credit available under this section.

(f) The benefit provided by this section shall not be applicable to the employees of any appointing power until the Director of Finance approves the transmittal of funds by that appointing power or the Board of Regents or the Board of Trustees to the retirement fund pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) The Director of Finance shall approve the transmittal of funds by the appointing power not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than any lesser time that the chairperson of the committee, or his or her designee, may in each instance determine. If there is any written communication between the Director of Finance and the Legislative Analyst, a copy of the communication shall be transmitted to the chairperson of each appropriate policy committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 249, Sec. 4.   (AB 654)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22716.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a member of the Defined Benefit Program upon any subsequent service under unpaid contract or any other unpaid basis with the trustees, shall not be required to forfeit the service credit granted under former Section 22732, as it read on June 29, 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22717.

(a) Upon certification by the employer or employers, a member shall be granted credit at service retirement for each day of accumulated and unused sick leave days for which full salary is allowed and to which the member was entitled on the member’s final day of employment with the employer or employers subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program during the last school term in which the member earned creditable compensation pursuant to Section 22119.2 or 22119.3. The system shall accept certification from each employer with which the member has accumulated sick leave days for that period, provided this leave has not been transferred to another employer.

(b) The amount of
 service credit to be granted shall be determined by dividing the number of accumulated, unused sick leave days by the number of
 base days, as defined in Section 22106.2.

(c) For members who are last employed with the state in a position in which there are no contracted base service days, the amount of service credit to be granted shall be 0.004 years of service for each day of unused sick leave certified to the board by the employer. The certification shall report only those days of unused sick leave that were accrued by the member during the normal course of the member’s employment subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program.

(d) When the member has made application for service retirement under this part, the employer shall certify to the board, within 30 days following the effective date of the member’s service retirement or the date the application for retirement is received by the
 system’s headquarters office, whichever is later, the number of days of accumulated and unused sick leave days that the member was entitled to on the final day of employment. The board may assess a penalty on delinquent reports.

(e) The member shall not receive credit for accumulated unused sick leave days if the member receives service credit in another public retirement system for the same unused sick leave days. 

(f) This section shall be applicable to any person who retires on or after January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 11.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22717.5.

(a) A member shall be credited at service retirement for each day of accumulated and unused leave of absence for education for which full salary is allowed on the member’s final day of employment with the state.

(b) The amount of service credit to be granted shall be 0.004 years of service for each unused day of educational leave credit.

(c) When the member has made application for service retirement under this part, the employer shall certify to the board, within 30 days following the effective date of the member’s service retirement or the date the application for retirement is received by the system’s headquarters office, whichever is later, the number of
 days of accumulated and unused leave of absence for education that the member was entitled to on the final day of employment. The board may assess a penalty on delinquent reports.

(d) This section shall apply to eligible state employees in state bargaining units that have agreed to this section in a memorandum of understanding, or as authorized by the Director of Human Resources for classifications of state employees that are excluded from the definition of “state employee” by paragraph (c) of Section 3513 of the Government Code.

(e) The provisions of this section shall be effective for eligible members who retire directly from state employment on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 12.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22718.

(a) The Teachers’ Retirement Board shall bill school employers for service credit granted for unused excess sick leave under this part, subject to the following provisions:

(1) (A) In addition to the certification of unused basic sick leave days, the employer shall also certify the number of unused excess sick leave days.

(B) Excess sick leave days granted by an employer other than the member’s last employer shall be deemed to be granted by the last employer and shall be included in the certification if the member was eligible to use those excess sick leave days while
 the member was employed by the last employer. If, during the last year a member is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program, that member is employed by more than one employer, unused excess sick leave days shall be certified and paid for by the employer for the period in which the member was eligible to use those excess sick leave days. 

(2) The employer shall be billed only for the present value of the unused excess sick leave days and any subsequent adjustments to the billing shall be billed or returned, as appropriate, to the employer.

(3) (A) The employer shall remit the amount billed to the system with the certification required by Section 22717 within 30 days after the effective date of
 the member’s retirement or within 30 days after the date the system has notified the employer that a certification must be made, whichever is later.

(B) If payment is not received within 30 calendar days, the present value shall be recalculated to include regular interest from the due date to the date full payment is received.

(C) If the system has billed the employer for an additional amount, the employer shall remit the additional amount within 30 calendar days after the date of the billing. If payment is not received for the additional amount within 30 calendar days, the present value shall be recalculated to include regular interest from the due date to the date full payment is received.

(b) If a school employer fails
 to pay a bill charged according to subdivision (a), the Teachers’ Retirement Board may request the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, as appropriate, to reduce state apportionments to the school employer by an amount equal to the amount billed. The Superintendent or chancellor shall make the reduction, and if requested by the board, direct the Controller to reduce the amount transferred from the General Fund to Section A or Section B, as appropriate, of the State School Fund by an equal amount, which shall instead be transferred to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 12.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22719.

If the allowance of a retired member is terminated, the employer shall not restore sick leave days for which service credit was granted at retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1006, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22720.

The service credited pursuant to Section 22717 may not be used in the determination of final compensation, except as provided in Section 22134.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 911, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22721.

Except as provided in Section 22717, no service credit shall be granted under this part for any payment made for accumulated sick leave upon transfer from one employer to another, upon termination of service, upon retirement, or upon death. No contributions under this part shall be withheld from any such payments. Payments for accumulated sick leave shall be paid to the member by separate warrant and shall not be included in any payroll warrant issued to the member. The payments shall not be included in the determination of “final compensation” under this part. No continued leave of absence shall be granted a member solely for the purpose of allowing the member to receive compensation for accumulated sick leave for which the member could otherwise have elected to receive payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22724.

(a) To determine the number of excess sick leave days to which a member is entitled when he or she retires, the employer shall deduct the days of sick leave used by the member from the member’s accumulated and unused sick leave balance according to the following method:

(1) Sick leave usage shall first be deducted from the accumulated and unused sick leave balance existing on July 1, 1986.

(2) Sick leave usage shall next be deducted from basic sick leave days granted to the member by an employer after June 30, 1986.

(3) Sick leave usage shall then be deducted from any excess sick leave days granted to the member by an employer after June 30, 1986.

(b) Upon request from the board, the employer shall submit sick leave records of past years for audit purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Permissive and Additional Service Credit [22800. - 22811.]

22800.

(a) Claims for permissive and additional service credit under this part shall be corroborated by a statement from the superintendent of schools or custodian of records of the employer for which the service was performed.

(b) Claims for creditable service under this part performed outside the United States or in federal schools within the United States shall be corroborated by a statement from the custodian of records.

(c) When the official records of the service have been destroyed, the claim may be corroborated by one or more affidavits of knowledge of the service, preferably by persons who served with the member at the time the service was performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22801.

(a) A member who requests to purchase additional service credit as provided in this chapter and Chapter 14.2 (commencing with Section 22820) shall pay, prior to retirement, all contributions with respect to that service at the contribution rate for additional service credit, adopted by the board as a plan amendment, in effect on the date of the request to purchase additional service credit. A member shall sign and return the completed statement of contributions and interest required from the system to purchase service credit at a specific cost no later than 35 calendar days from the date of the offer. If the system is unable to inform the member or beneficiary of the amount required to purchase additional service credit prior to the effective date of the applicable allowance, the member or beneficiary may make the required
 payment within 30 working days after the date of mailing of the statement of contributions and interest required or the effective date of the appropriate allowance, whichever is later, except as provided in subdivision (i). The payment shall be paid in full before a member or beneficiary receives any adjustment in the appropriate allowance due because of that payment. Contributions shall be made in a lump sum, or in not more than 120 monthly installments, not to exceed 10 years. No installment, except the final installment, shall be less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(b) If the member is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program on the date of the request to purchase additional service credit, the contributions shall be based upon the compensation earnable in the current school year or either of the two immediately preceding school years, whichever is highest.

(c) If the member is not employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program on the date of the request to purchase additional service credit, the contributions shall be based upon the compensation earnable in the last school year of credited service or either of the two immediately preceding school years, whichever is highest, and additional regular interest shall be added to the contributions from July 1 of the subsequent year in which the member last performed creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program to the date of the request.

(d) The employer may pay the amount required as employer contributions for additional service credited under paragraphs (7), (8), (9), and (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 22803.

(e) The Public Employees’ Retirement System
 shall transfer the actuarial present value of the assets of a person who makes an election pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 22803.

(f) Regular interest shall be charged on the monthly unpaid balance if the member pays in installments. Regular interest may not be charged or be payable for the period of a delay caused by the system’s inability or failure to determine and inform the member or beneficiary of the amount of contributions and interest that is payable. The period of delay shall commence on the 20th calendar day following the day on which the member or beneficiary who wishes to make payment evidences in writing to the system that they are ready, willing, and able to make payment to the system. The period of delay shall cease on the first day of the month following the mailing of notification of contributions and interest payable.

(g) If the payment
 described in subdivision (a) is not received at the system’s headquarters office within 120 calendar days of the due date, the election pursuant to this section shall be canceled. The member shall receive credit for additional service based on the payments that were made or the member may request a return of their payments.

(h) If the election to purchase additional service credit is canceled as described in subdivision (g), the member may, prior to the effective date of their retirement, elect to purchase additional service credit pursuant to this section.

(i) The measurement of time within which the purchase of additional service credit described in subdivision (a) shall be made is subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 117, Sec. 1.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22801.5.

(a) A member who elects pursuant to Section 22508.6 to have his or her state service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program shall receive additional service credit for the time spent subject to coverage by the Public Employees’ Retirement System between July 1, 1991, and the effective date of the election.

(b) A member described in subdivision (a) shall pay all contributions with respect to his or her state service as a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System at the contribution rate for additional service credit, adopted by the board as a plan amendment, in effect at the time of the election. Contributions shall be made in a lump sum or in not more than 120 monthly installments, not to exceed ten years. Payment shall be made or shall commence within 120 days after the date of the election. No installment, except the final installment, shall be less than twenty-five dollars ($25). The member may not be credited with any service pursuant to this section until the contributions have been paid in full.

(c) If the member is employed to perform creditable service at the time of the election, the contributions shall be based upon the compensation earnable in the current school year or either of the two immediately preceding school years, whichever is highest.

(d) If the member is not employed to perform creditable service at the time of the election, the contributions shall be based upon the compensation earnable in the last school year of credited service or either of the two immediately preceding school years, whichever is highest.

(e) The total amount of contributions due from the member under subdivision (b) shall be reduced by the amount received from the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 20309.5 of the Government Code. Under no circumstances may the assets received from the Public Employees’ Retirement System, pursuant to that section, be allocated or awarded to individual members or their spouses or beneficiaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 859, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22802.

(a) A member, other than a retired member, who was previously excluded from membership in the Defined Benefit Program may request to purchase service credit for:

(1) Service as a substitute excluded under Section 22602.

(2) Creditable service subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program if the member is currently contributing to the Defined Benefit Program and has terminated all service subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program. Upon requesting to purchase service credit under this paragraph, the member shall cease to be eligible for a benefit for the same service or time previously credited under the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to Part 14 (commencing with
 Section 26000).

(3) Service performed on a part-time basis excluded under Section 22601.5 or Section 22604, other than service credited under paragraph (2).

(4) Adult education service excluded under Section 22603, as it read on December 31, 1995.

(5) Service as a school nurse excluded under Section 22606, as it read on December 31, 1995.

(6) Service performed in a position prior to the date the position was made subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.

(7) Service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program performed while a member of another California public retirement system, provided the member has ceased to be a member of, and has ceased to be entitled to
 benefits from, the other retirement system. The member shall not receive credit for the service if the member may redeposit withdrawn contributions and subsequently be eligible for any benefits based upon the same service or based upon other full-time service performed during the same period, from another California public retirement system.

(b) A member who requests to purchase service credit under this part for service performed while excluded from membership under the Defined Benefit Program shall pay all of the required contributions for all or the portion of that service for which the member requests to purchase service credit.

(c) A member shall not request to purchase service credit for service or time described in paragraphs (1) and (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) if, after the request, the member would continue to receive credit for the same service or time in
 the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) or another public retirement system.

(d) A member shall not purchase service credit for any school year if the purchase would result in more than one year of service for that school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 186, Sec. 3.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22803.

(a) A member, other than a retired member, may request to purchase service credit for any of the following:

(1) Service performed in a teaching position in the University of California or California State University that is not covered by another public retirement system.

(2) Service performed in a certificated teaching position in a child care center operated by a county superintendent of schools or a school district in this state.

(3) Service performed in a teaching position in the California School for the Deaf or the California School for the Blind, or in special classes maintained by the
 public schools of this state for the instruction of the deaf, the hard of hearing, the blind, or the semisighted.

(4) Service performed in a certificated teaching position in a federally supported and administered Indian school in this state.

(5) Time served, not to exceed two years, in a certificated teaching position in a job corps center administered by the United States government in this state if the member was employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within one year prior to entering the job corps and returned to employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within six months following the date of termination of service in the job corps.

(6) Time served, not to exceed two years, in a teaching position as a
 member of the Peace Corps if the member was employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within one year prior to entering the Peace Corps and returned to employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within six months following the date of termination of service in the Peace Corps.

(7) Time spent on a sabbatical leave, approved by an employer in this state after meeting the requirements of Section 44969.

(8) Time spent on an approved leave, approved by an employer in this state, to participate in any program under the federal Mutual Educational and Cultural Exchange Program.

(9) Time spent on leave approved by an employer in this state as maternity or paternity leave, not to exceed 24 consecutive months, regardless of
 whether or not the leave was taken before or after the addition of this subdivision.

(10) Time spent on an employer-approved leave based on the guidelines for the Family and Medical Leave Act or the California Family Rights Act, or both, up to a total of 12 workweeks in any 12-month period.

(11) Time spent employed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in a position subject to coverage by the Public Employees’ Retirement System between July 1, 1991, and December 31, 1997, provided the member has elected to return to coverage under the State Teachers’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 20309 of the Government Code.

(b) In no event shall the member receive credit for service or time described in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (a) if the member has received or is eligible
 to receive credit for the same service or time in the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) or another public retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 8.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22804.

For the purposes of this chapter, war with a foreign power exists under any of the following conditions:

(a) Whenever Congress has declared war and peace has not been formally restored.

(b) Whenever the United States is engaged in active military operations against any foreign power, whether or not war has been formally declared.

(c) Whenever the United States is assisting the United Nations, in actions involving the use of armed force, to maintain or restore international peace and security.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22805.

(a) A member may request to receive credit under this part for time served in the active military service of the United States or of this state, including active service in any uniformed auxiliary to any branch of that military service authorized as an auxiliary by Congress or the Legislature, or in the full-time paid service of the American Red Cross prior to September 1957, if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The time served was during war with any foreign power or during other national emergency, or in time of peace if the member was drafted for that service by the United States government.

(2) The member was employed to perform creditable service
 subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program within one year prior to entering that service. Time included under this section shall be considered as served in the state in which the member was last employed before entering that service.

(b) Time during which the member was absent without compensation for other cause, on leave or otherwise, shall not be included.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 9.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22806.

(a) A member who retired on or after December 31, 1981, may elect to receive credit under this part, of not to exceed four years, for time served of not less than one year, prior to membership in the Defined Benefit Program, in the Armed Forces of the United States or in the Merchant Marine of the United States. Service credit shall not be granted if that service terminated with a discharge under dishonorable conditions. The service credit to be accorded pursuant to this section for that
 service shall be on the basis of one year of credit for each five years of credited service, but shall not exceed a total of four years of service credit regardless of the number of years of either that service or subsequent service. A member electing to receive credit under this part for that service shall have been credited with at least 10 years of service on the date of election.

(b) A member who elects to become subject to this section shall pay all reasonable administrative costs and contributions, sufficient to cover the total employer and employee cost plus interest of the military service credit,
 to be calculated in a manner consistent with other permissive service credit purchases in this chapter, as determined by the board.

(c) This section shall not apply to a member who is receiving either of the following:

(1) Military retirement pay based on 20 or more years of active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States, except for credit toward military retirement pay that is earned by a combination of active duty and nonactive duty with a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States and where the retirement pay is payable only upon the attainment of a specified age.

(2) Disability retirement pay that is paid by one of the Armed Forces of the United States, except for a
 member who is receiving disability compensation from the Veterans Administration and is not receiving retirement pay from one of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(d) A member shall not receive credit for service or time under this section if the member has received or is eligible to receive credit for the same service or time in the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) or in another public retirement system.

(e) The board has no duty to locate or notify any member or to provide the name or address of any member,
 agency, or entity for the purpose of notifying those persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22807.

(a) A member of the Defined Benefit Program who voluntarily requests or agrees to an extension of his or her original term of enlistment, service, or tour of duty shall not receive credit under this part for time served during the extension of military service after December 31, 1958.

(b) In no event shall a member receive credit for more than four years of military service performed after June 30, 1998, except where otherwise authorized in accordance with Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 22850).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22808.
